Hawaii statutes.
[§431:30-110] Qualified immunity; defense;
indemnification. (a) The members, officers, executive director,
employees, and representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for
damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability
caused or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
occurred or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities;
provided that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to protect any such
person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused
by the intentional or wilful and wanton misconduct of any such person.

(b) The commission shall defend any member,
officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the commission in
any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or
alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the defendant had a reasonable
basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties,
or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to
prohibit such person from retaining counsel; provided further that the actual
or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or
wilful and wanton misconduct of any such person.

(c) The commission shall indemnify and hold
harmless the member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative
of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against
such persons arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or that such persons had a reasonable basis for believing
occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities; provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission
did not result from the intentional or wilful and wanton misconduct of any such
person. [L 2004, c 104, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next